Utah statutes.
77-28-3.   Duties and powers of courts, departments, agencies and officers
in enforcing and effecting compact.
The courts, departments, agencies and officers of this state and its
subdivisions shall enforce this compact and shall do all things appropriate to
the effectuation of its purposes and intent which may be within their
respective jurisdictions including but not limited to the making and
submission of such reports as are required by the compact.
